Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 2.1 Farm Milk Holding Tanks

21-2.1-1.
Calibration, testing, and sealing of farm milk holding tanks — Fees.

The capacity of every farm milk holding tank (when used as a measure) shall be calibrated, tested, and sealed by the director of labor and training. The fee for this calibration shall be five dollars ($5.00) plus a fee of one-half cent ($0.005) per gallon for its determined total capacity.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 150, § 1.

21-2.1-2.
Tampering with the gauging mechanism prohibited — Penalty for violation.

It shall be a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) for each offense for any person to tamper with or alter in any way the gauging mechanism of a farm milk holding tank.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 150, § 1.

21-2.1-3.
Frequency of calibration required.

Every farm milk holding tank (when used as a measure) shall be recalibrated at least once every three (3) years. Following the calibration, testing, and sealing as set forth in §

21-2.1-1

, the state sealer of weights and measures of the department of labor and training shall issue and deliver to the owner of the milk holding tank a gallonage chart and weight conversion chart applicable to that holding tank.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 150, § 1.